Illinois, session 104th, SB3823.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 143.17 and 143.29 and by adding Article 6XLVIII as follows: 7    (215 ILCS 5/143.17)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.17)8    Sec. 143.17. Notice of intention not to renew. 9    a. No company shall fail to renew any policy of insurance, 10as defined in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of Section 11143.13, to which Section 143.11 applies, unless it shall send 12by mail to the named insured at least 30 days advance notice of 13its intention not to renew. The company shall maintain proof 14of mailing of such notice on a recognized U.S. Post Office form 15or a form acceptable to the U. S. Post Office or other 16commercial mail delivery service. The nonrenewal shall not 17become effective until at least 30 days from the proof of 18mailing date of the notice to the name insured. Notification 19shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if known, or the 20agent of record, if known, and to the last known mortgagee or 21lien holder. For purposes of this Section, the mortgagee or 22lien holder, insured's broker, or the agent of record may opt 23to accept notification electronically. However, where   SB3823- 2 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, the notice of 2cancellation must be mailed at least 10 days before the 3effective date of the cancellation.4    b. This Section does not apply if the company has 5manifested its willingness to renew directly to the named 6insured. Such written notice shall specify the premium amount 7payable, including any premium payment plan available, and the 8name of any person or persons, if any, authorized to receive 9payment on behalf of the company. If no person is so 10authorized, the premium notice shall so state.11    b-5. This Section does not apply if the company manifested 12its willingness to renew directly to the named insured. 13However, no company may impose renewal premium increases of 14more than 10% for lines of business enumerated in subsection 15(a) of Section 143.13, unless the company mails or delivers by 16electronic means, in compliance with Section 143.34, to the 17named insured and by electronic means to the Department notice 18of the increase in renewal premium at least 60 days prior to 19the renewal or anniversary date. No no company may impose 20changes in deductibles or coverage for any policy forms 21applicable to an entire line of business enumerated in 22subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of Section 143.13 to which 23Section 143.11 applies unless the company mails or delivers by 24electronic means, in compliance with Section 143.34, to the 25named insured written notice of the change in deductible or 26coverage at least 60 days prior to the renewal or anniversary   SB3823- 3 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1date. 2    Notice shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if 3known, or the agent of record. For purposes of this subsection 4b-5, policyholder-initiated changes to coverage and exposure 5changes are not included in the renewal premium increases that 6require a company to provide notice to the insured. 7    c. Should a company fail to comply with (a) or (b) of this 8Section, the policy shall terminate only on the effective date 9of any similar insurance procured by the insured with respect 10to the same subject or location designated in both policies.11    d. Renewal of a policy does not constitute a waiver or 12estoppel with respect to grounds for cancellation which 13existed before the effective date of such renewal.14    e. In all notices of intention not to renew any policy of 15insurance, as defined in Section 143.11 the company shall 16provide the named insured a specific explanation of the 17reasons for nonrenewal.18    f. For purposes of this Section, the insured's broker, if 19known, or the agent of record and the mortgagee or lien holder 20may opt to accept notification electronically. 21(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 22    (215 ILCS 5/143.29)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.29)23    Sec. 143.29. (a) The rates and premium charges for every 24policy of automobile liability insurance shall include 25appropriate reductions as determined by the insurer for any   SB3823- 4 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1insured over age 55 upon successful completion of the National 2Safety Council's Defensive Driving Course or a motor vehicle 3crash prevention course, including an eLearning course, that 4is found by the Secretary of State to meet or exceed the 5standards of the National Safety Council's Defensive Driving 6Course's 4-hour 8 hour classroom safety instruction program or 7eLearning course.8    (b) The premium reduction shall remain in effect for the 9qualifying insured for a period of 3 years from the date of 10successful completion of the crash prevention course, except 11that the insurer may elect to apply the premium reduction 12beginning either with the last effective date of the policy or 13the next renewal date of the policy if the reduction will 14result in a savings as though applied over a full 3 year 15period. An insured who has completed the course of instruction 16prior to July 1, 1982 shall receive the insurance premium 17reduction for only the period remaining within the 3 years 18from course completion. The period of premium reduction for an 19insured who has repeated the crash prevention course shall be 20based upon the last such course the insured has successfully 21completed.22    (c) Any crash prevention course approved by the Secretary 23of State under this Section shall be taught by an instructor 24approved by the Secretary of State, shall consist of at least 8 25hours of classroom or eLearning equivalent instruction and 26shall provide for a certificate of completion. Records of   SB3823- 5 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1certification of course completion shall be maintained in a 2manner acceptable to the Secretary of State.3    (d) Any person claiming eligibility for a rate or premium 4reduction shall be responsible for providing to the person's 5his insurance company the information necessary to determine 6eligibility.7    (e) This Section shall not apply to:8        (1) any motor vehicle which is a part of a fleet or is 9    used for commercial purposes unless there is a regularly 10    assigned principal operator.11        (2) any motor vehicle subject to a higher premium rate 12    because of the insured's previous motor vehicle claim 13    experience or to any motor vehicle whose principal 14    operator has been convicted of violating any of the motor 15    vehicle laws of this State, until that operator shall have 16    maintained a driving record free of crashes and moving 17    violations for a continuous one year period, in which case 18    such driver shall be eligible for a reduction the 19    remaining 2 years of the 3 year period.20        (3) any motor vehicle whose principal operator has had 21    the principal operator's his drivers license revoked or 22    suspended for any reason by the Secretary of State within 23    the previous 36 months.24        (4) any policy of group automobile insurance under 25    which premiums are broadly averaged for the group rather 26    than determined individually.  SB3823- 6 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1(Source: P.A. 102-397, eff. 1-1-22; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 2    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)3ARTICLE XLVIII. RATES FOR AUTOMOBILE INSURANCE 4    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)5    Sec. 1801. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 6promote the public welfare by regulating automobile insurance 7rates so that the rates will not be excessive, inadequate, or 8unfairly discriminatory. Nothing in this Article is intended 9to prohibit or discourage reasonable competition or to 10authorize or encourage, except to the extent necessary to 11accomplish the purpose of this Article, uniformity in 12insurance rates, rating systems, rating plans, or practices. 13This Article shall be liberally construed to carry into effect 14the provisions of this Section. 15    (215 ILCS 5/1802 new)16    Sec. 1802. Applicability. This Article applies to policies 17of automobile insurance, as defined in subsection (a) of 18Section 143.13. 19    (215 ILCS 5/1803 new)20    Sec. 1803. Rate standards; excessive, inadequate, or 21unfairly discriminatory. 22    (a) Rates shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly   SB3823- 7 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1discriminatory.2    (b) A rate is inadequate if it endangers the solvency of 3the insurer.4    (c) A rate is unfairly discriminatory if, after allowing 5for practical limitations, the price differentials fail to 6reflect the difference in expected losses and expenses. A rate 7is not unfairly discriminatory if different rates result for 8policyholders with similar loss exposures but different 9expenses, or similar expenses but different loss exposures, so 10long as the rate reflects the differences with reasonable 11accuracy.12    (d) A rate is reasonable and not excessive, inadequate, or 13unfairly discriminatory if it is an actuarially sound estimate 14of the expected value of all future costs associated with an 15individual risk transfer.16    (e) Insurance providers shall not use the following 17factors in any manner that increases an insured's premium, 18results in a nonrenewal of an insurance policy, or leads to the 19cancellation of an insurance policy:20        (1) an insured's zip code;21        (2) an insured's credit score, credit-based insurance 22    score, or any insurance score that uses or relies upon an 23    insured's credit score; or24        (3) an insured's age, if the insured is over 65 years 25    of age.    SB3823- 8 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1    (215 ILCS 5/1804 new)2    Sec. 1804. Determinations and notice; hearing. 3    (a) If the Department believes that a filing is excessive, 4inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory pursuant to Section 51803, the Department shall send the company notice, 6specifying: (1) in what respects the filing fails to meet the 7requirements of this Article and (2) if applicable, any 8modifications that are required. The notice shall specify a 9reasonable period after which the filing is no longer 10effective if the company fails to timely request a hearing 11under subsection (b). If the company timely requests a hearing 12under subsection (b), the filing shall remain in effect until 13the conclusion of the hearing and a final order is issued. If 14the Department finds that a rate is excessive, inadequate, or 15unfairly discriminatory pursuant to this Article, the final 16order may specify a reasonable period after which the filing 17is no longer effective and any rebates that must be remitted to 18affected consumers.19    (b) The company may request a hearing on the notice within 2010 days after receipt. Failure to request a hearing within 10 21days shall be deemed the company's acceptance of the 22Department's determination.  23    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)24    Sec. 1805. Prohibition on cost-shifting. Credible 25State-specific loss experience shall be used in the   SB3823- 9 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1development of rates whenever such data is available and 2statistically reliable. To meet actuarial standards of 3credibility, insurers may supplement State-specific loss 4experience with countrywide or regional loss experience. 5Nothing in this Section shall apply to rating relativity 6development during ratemaking. This Section shall only apply 7to companies issuing policies that are subject to this 8Article.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 101, 2027.  SB3823- 10 -LRB104 20657 JDS 34155 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    215 ILCS 5/143.17from Ch. 73, par. 755.174    215 ILCS 5/143.29from Ch. 73, par. 755.295    215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII 6    heading new7    215 ILCS 5/1801 new8    215 ILCS 5/1802 new9    215 ILCS 5/1803 new10    215 ILCS 5/1804 new11    215 ILCS 5/1805 new